Washington statutes.
RCW 43.384.800

Evaluation by joint legislative audit and review committee.

The joint legislative audit and review committee must conduct an evaluation of the performance of the authority created in chapter 43.384 RCW and report its findings and recommendations, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the governor and the economic development committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2023. The purpose of the evaluation is to determine the extent to which the authority has contributed to the growth of the tourism industry and economic development of the state. An interim report by the authority, submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, is due to the governor and economic development committees of the house of representatives and senate by December 1, 2021. The report must provide an update on the authority's progress in implementing a statewide tourism marketing program.

[ 2018 c 275 s 11.]